Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 7. Other Vehicles

§ 1361.
Lights on vehicles other than motor vehicles.

Every vehicle on wheels or runners, whether stationary or in motion on a public highway, shall have attached to it a light that shall be so displayed as to be clearly visible from the front and rear during the period from 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise.
However, this section shall not apply to a vehicle that is designed to be propelled by hand. During the same period, towed or trailing vehicles, farm machinery, or other equipment, whether stationary or in motion on a public highway, shall have attached to them a red light or reflector which shall be so displayed as to be clearly visible from the rear, under normal atmospheric conditions, or a reflectorized slow moving vehicle symbol of a standard type approved by the Commissioner.
Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to affect any statute, rule, or regulation requiring lights on motor vehicles and the obligation of the owner or operator thereof.
The driver of a vehicle shall be deemed the responsible party, liable to the penalty for violation hereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 38

(Sp. Sess.), § 4;

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 1362.
Night operation.

Farm tractors, motorized highway building equipment, and road-making appliances when operated upon a public highway during the period from 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise shall comply with the requirements of this title relating to head lamp and taillight requirements.